Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Board of Barbers and Hairdressers.

Sec. 08.13.010.
Creation and membership of board.

There is created the Board of Barbers and Hairdressers consisting of seven members appointed by the governor.

The board consists of

one person licensed as a barber under this chapter;

one person licensed to practice body piercing, tattooing, or permanent cosmetic coloring under this chapter;

two persons licensed as hairdressers under this chapter, one of whom is also licensed as an esthetician under this chapter;

one public member;

one person licensed to practice manicuring under this chapter; and

one person licensed to practice any activity licensed under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 93 SLA 2000; am § 13 ch 32 SLA 2016; am § 2 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, in (a), substituted “seven” for “six”; in (b)(1), substituted “one person” for “two persons” and “a barber” for “barbers”; added (5) and (6); and made related stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (b)(2) deleted “or licensed to practice” following “to practice body piercing;” and substituted “tattooing, or” for “tattooing and”.

Sec. 08.13.020.
Terms of office and removal of members. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.035.]

Sec. 08.13.030.
Powers and duties of the board.

The board shall exercise general control over the vocations of barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, manicuring, esthetics, body piercing, tattooing, and permanent cosmetic coloring.

The board shall

examine applicants and approve the issuance of licenses and permits to practice;

authorize the issuance of licenses for schools of barbering, hairdressing, manicuring, and esthetics;

develop written instructions and notices that tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, and body piercing shop owners and practitioners are required to give or display under AS

08.13.215

;

enforce the provisions of this chapter, regulations adopted under this chapter, and regulations relating to barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, manicuring, and esthetics adopted under AS

44.46.020(a)(5)(C)

.

The board may

suspend or revoke a license or permit;

on its own motion or upon receipt of a written complaint, conduct hearings and request the

Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development to investigate the practices of a person, shop, or school involved in the practice or teaching of barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, manicuring, or esthetics; or

Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development or the Department of Environmental Conservation to investigate the practices of a person, shop, or school involved in the practice or teaching of body piercing, tattooing, or permanent cosmetic coloring;

adopt regulations or do any act necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 57 SLA 1999; am § 4 ch 93 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in (c)(2) of this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For examination applications and standards, see 12 AAC 9, art. 1.

For examinations, see 12 AAC 9, art. 3.

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 9, art. 4.

For schools and curriculum, see 12 AAC 9, art. 5.

For student permits, training, and apprentices, see 12 AAC 9, art. 6.

For barbering, hairdressing, manicuring, or esthetics schools and shops, see 18 AAC 23, art. 2.

For body piercing, tattooing, or permanent cosmetic coloring shops, see 18 AAC 23, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “hair braiding,” following “hairdressing,”, deleted “and the vocation of” preceding “tattooing” and made related and stylistic changes; in (b)(3), deleted “shop owners and practitioners” following “cosmetic coloring,” and made related changes, added (b)(4); rewrote (c)(2).

Sec. 08.13.040.
Meetings and examinations.

The board shall meet as often as necessary to conduct its business. It shall conduct separate examinations covering the following fields of practice: barbering, hairdressing, advanced manicuring, and esthetics. Examinations shall be given at least twice in every year for each of these fields of practice for which applications for licensure or endorsements are pending. An applicant may take an examination in more than one field during the same testing session. The board may not require an applicant for licensure as a manicurist to take or pass an examination conducted by the board for the field of manicuring; however, nothing in this sentence prohibits the board from requiring a licensed manicurist to pass an examination to obtain an optional endorsement as an advanced manicurist under AS

08.13.080(f)

.

The board may not require a person applying for a limited license to practice non-chemical barbering under AS

08.13.100(f)

to take an examination that tests the person’s knowledge of chemical processes, including permanent waving, bleaching, coloring, or chemical straightening.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 57 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 27 SLA 2015; am § 2 ch 12 SLA 2017; am § 4 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For examination applications and standards, see 12 AAC 9, art. 1.

For examinations, see 12 AAC 9, art. 3.

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 9, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective January 1, 2016, deleted “advanced” after “hairdressing” in the second sentence, deleted “or endorsements” after “for licensure” in the third sentence, and deleted the fifth sentence, which read, “The board may not require an applicant for licensure as a manicurist to take or pass an examination conducted by the board for the field of manicuring; however, nothing in this sentence prohibits the board from requiring a licensed manicurist to pass an examination to obtain an optional endorsement as an advanced manicurist under AS

08.13.080(c)

.”

The 2017 amendment, effective June 17, 2017, in the second sentence, inserted “advanced” preceding “manicuring”, in the third sentence, inserted “or endorsements” following “applications for licensure”, added the last sentence.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (b).

Sec. 08.13.050.
Records of the board.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall keep a record of the board’s proceedings related to the issuance, refusal, suspension, and revocation of each license and permit. The record shall contain the name of the person to whom a license or permit is issued, the person’s place of business, the date of issuance for each license and permit, and whether it is currently valid. The record shall be open to inspection by the public at all reasonable times.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 137 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 6 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.